incubator/apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AĄBCČDEĘĖFGHIĮYJKLMNOPRSŠTUŲŪVZŽaąbcčdeęėfghiįyjklmnoprsštuųūvzž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="daiktavardis"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="top"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="veiksmažodis"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"  c="būti"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="būdvardis"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="įvardis"/>
    <sdef n="num"    c="skaitvardis"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="jungtukas"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="prielinksnis"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="adverb"/>

    <sdef n="f"      c="moteriška"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="vyriška"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c="niekatroji"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c=""/>

    <sdef n="sp"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="vienaskaita"/>
    <sdef n="du"     c="dviskaita"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="daugiskaita"/>

    <sdef n="nom"    c="vardininkas"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="kilmininkas"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="naudininkas"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="galininkas"/>
    <sdef n="ins"    c="įnagininkas"/>
    <sdef n="loc"    c="vietininkas"/>
    <sdef n="ill"    c="iliatyvas/kryptininkas"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="šauksmininkas"/>

    <sdef n="pst"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="dem"    c="demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="pirmasis asmuo"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="antrasis asmuo"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="trečiasis asmuo"/>

    <sdef n="pri"    c="present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="past"/>
    <sdef n="pfi"    c="past frequentative indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="act"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="sint"   c=""/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
  
    <!-- Numerals -->
    <pardef n="vien/as__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iems</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omis</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>as<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/u__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viejų</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viem</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viejuose</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viem</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viejų</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viem</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viejose</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>viem</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vienas"><i>vien</i><par n="vien/as__num"/></e>
    <e lm="du"><i>d</i><par n="d/u__num"/></e>
